Massachusetts, session 194th, H3027.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, any city, town, or political subdivision of the commonwealth may 
grant abatement of the real estate taxes assessed upon the property owned and occupied by the 
surviving spouse or guardian of a child whose parent was an emergency first responder or 
corrections officer killed in the line of duty as such, provided that such real estate is occupied by 
the child as his or her domicile.